Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1257
Transmittal of information; when.

In accordance with any request duly made by an authorized official or agency of the United States, any information compiled or otherwise available to the commission pursuant to sections 37-1255 and 37-1256 shall be transmitted to such official or agency of the United States.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 57.